Utah statutes.
16-6a-819.   Duties of officers.

Each officer shall have the authority and shall perform the duties set forth with respect to the office:

(1)  in the bylaws; or

(2)  to the extent not inconsistent with the bylaws, prescribed with respect to the office by:

(a)  the board of directors; or

(b)  an officer authorized by the board of directors.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

